California statutes. Public Resources Code
Middle Fork of the Smith RiverRecreational(33)South Siskiyou Fork of the Smith River
from its source about 0.6 miles southwest of
Buck Lake as depicted on 1956 USGS 15´
“Preston Peak”
 topographic map to the
confluence with the Siskiyou Fork of the
Smith RiverWild(34)South Fork Smith River from its source
about 0.5 miles southwest of Bear Mountain
as depicted on 1956 USGS 15´ “Preston
Peak” topographic map to Blackhawk BarWild(35)South Fork Smith River from Blackhawk
Bar to the confluence with the Middle Fork
Smith RiverRecreational(36)Williams Creek from its source in Section
31 T14N R4E as depicted on 1952 USGS
15´ “Ship Mountain” topographic map to
the confluence with Eight Mile CreekRecreational(37)Eight Mile Creek from its source in Section
29 T14N R4E as depicted on 1955 USGS
15´ “Dillon Mtn.” topographic map to the
confluence with the South Fork Smith RiverRecreational(38)Prescott Fork of the Smith River from
 its
source about 0.5 miles southeast of Island
Lake as depicted on 1955 USGS 15´
“Dillon Mtn.” topographic map to the
confluence with the South Fork Smith RiverRecreational(39)Quartz Creek from its source in Section 31
T16N R4E as depicted on 1952 USGS 15´
“Ship Mountain” topographic map to the
confluence with the South Fork Smith RiverRecreational(40)Jones Creek from its source in Section 36
T16N R3E as depicted on 1952 USGS 15´
“Ship Mountain” topographic map to the
middle of
 Section 5 T15N R3ERecreational(41)Jones Creek from the middle of Section 5
T15N R3E to the confluence with the South
Fork of the Smith RiverRecreational(42)Hurdygurdy Creek from its source about 0.4
miles southwest of Bear Basin Butte as
depicted on 1956 USGS 15´ “Preston Peak”
topographic map to the confluence with the
South Fork Smith RiverRecreational(43)Gordon Creek from its source in Section 18
T16N R3E as depicted on 1951 USGS 15´
“Gasquet” topographic map to the
confluence with the South Fork Smith RiverRecreational(44)Coon Creek from the junction of the two
source tributaries in the southwest quadrant
of Section 31 T17N R3E as depicted on
1951 USGS 15´ “Gasquet” topographic
map to the western boundary of Section 14
T16N R2ERecreational(45)Coon Creek from the western boundary of
Section 14 T16N R2E to the confluence
with the South Fork Smith RiverRecreational(46)Craigs Creek from its source in Section 36
T17N R2E as depicted on 1951 USGS 15´
“Gasquet” topographic map to the
confluence with the South Fork Smith RiverRecreational(47)Buck Creek from its source at Cedar Camp
Spring as depicted on 1952 USGS 15´
“Ship Mountain” topographic map to the
confluence with the South Fork
 Smith RiverRecreational(48)Muzzleloader Creek from its source in
Section 2 T15N R3E as depicted on 1952
USGS 15´ “Ship Mountain” topographic
map to the confluence with Jones CreekRecreational(49)Canthook Creek from its source in Section 2
T15N R2E as depicted on 1952 USGS 15´
“Ship Mountain” topographic map to the
confluence with the South Fork Smith RiverRecreational(f)Eel River:(1)The Eel River from 100 yards below 
 Cape Horn Dam to the confluence with Tomki
CreekRecreational(2)The Eel River from the confluence with
Tomki Creek to the middle of Section 22
T19N R12WScenic(3)The
 Eel River from the middle of Section
22 T19N R12W to the boundary between
Sections 7 and 8 T19N R12WRecreational(4)The Eel River from the boundary between
Sections 7 and 8 T19N R12W to the
confluence with Outlet CreekWild(5)The Eel River from the confluence with
Outlet Creek to the mouth at the Pacific
OceanRecreational(6)The South Fork of the Eel River from the
mouth of Section Four Creek near
BranscombRecreational(7)The South Fork of the Eel River from
Horseshoe Bend to the middle of Section 29
T23N R16WWild(8)The South Fork of the Eel River from the
middle of Section 29 T23N R16W to the
confluence with the main Eel near WeottRecreational(9)Middle Fork of the Eel River from the
intersection of the river with the southern
boundary of the Middle Eel-Yolla Bolly
Wilderness Area to the Eel River Ranger
StationWild(10)The Middle Fork of the Eel River from Eel
River Ranger Station to Williams CreekRecreational(11)The Middle Fork of the Eel River from
Williams Creek to the southern boundary
 of
the northern quarter of Section 25 T22N
R12WScenic(12)The Middle Fork of the Eel River from the
southern boundary of the northern quarter of
Section 25 T22N R12W to the boundary
between Sections 4 and 5 T21N R13WWild(13)The Middle Fork of the Eel River from the
boundary between Sections 4 and 5 T21N
R13W to the confluence with main Eel at
Dos RiosRecreational(14)The North Fork of the Eel River from the
Old Gilman Ranch to the middle of Section
8 T24N R13WWild(15)The North Fork of the Eel River from the
middle of Section 8 T24N R13W to the
boundary between Sections 12 and 13 T24N
R14WRecreational(16)The North Fork of the Eel River from the
boundary between Sections 12 and 13 T24N
R14W to the confluence with main EelWild(g)Van Duzen River:(1)The Van Duzen River from the
Dinsmore Bridge to the powerline crossing
above Little Larabee CreekScenic(2)The Van Duzen River from the powerline
crossing above Little Larabee Creek to the
confluence with Eel RiverRecreational(h)Lower American River: The Lower Ameri-can River from Nimbus Dam to its junction
with the Sacramento RiverRecreational(i)North Fork American River:(1)The North Fork from the source of the
North Fork American River to two and
one-half miles above the Forest Hill-Soda
Springs RoadWild(2)The North Fork from two and one-half
miles above the Forest Hill-Soda Springs
Road to one-half mile below the Forest
Hill-Soda Springs RoadScenic(3)The North Fork from one-half mile below
the Forest Hill-Soda Springs Road to
one-quarter mile above the Iowa Hill
BridgeWild(4)The North
 Fork from one-quarter mile
above the Iowa Hill Bridge to the Iowa Hill
BridgeScenic(j)West Walker River:(1)West Walker River from Tower Lake to
northern boundary of Section 10 (T5N,
R22E)Wild(2)West Walker River From northern boundary
of Section 10 (T5N, R22E) to the eastern
boundary of Section 23 (T6N, R22E)Scenic(3)West Walker River from the eastern
boundary of Section 23 (T6N, R22E) to the
eastern boundary of Section 24 (T6N,
R22E)Recreational(4)West Walker River from the eastern
boundary of Section 24 (T6N, R22E) to the
confluence with Little Walker RiverScenic(5)West
 Walker River from the confluence
with Little Walker River to the confluence
with Rock CreekRecreational(6)Leavitt Creek from Leavitt Falls to the
confluence with West Walker RiverScenic(k)East Fork Carson River: East ForkCarson River from Hangman’s Bridge
crossing of state Highway 89 to the
California-Nevada borderScenic(l)(1) The South Yuba River:(A)The South Yuba River from Lang
Crossing to the confluence with
Fall CreekScenic(B)The South Yuba River from the
confluence with Fall Creek to the
confluence with Jefferson
 Creek
below the Town of WashingtonRecreational(C)The South Yuba River from the
confluence with Jefferson Creek
to Edwards CrossingScenic(D)The South Yuba River from
Edwards Crossing to its
confluence with Kentucky Creek
below
 BridgeportScenic(2)This subdivision shall become operative
January 1, 2001.(m)Albion River: The Albion River from one-fourthmile upstream of its confluence with
Deadman Gulch downstream to its mouth at
the Pacific OceanRecreational(n)Gualala River: The main stem GualalaRiver from the confluence of the North and
South Forks to the Pacific Ocean
Recreational(o)Cache Creek:(1)North Fork Section:
From Highway 20 two miles downstream to
the confluence of Cache Creek and the North
Fork Cache CreekScenic(2)Mainstem Section:(A)One-quarter mile downstream of Cache Creek
Dam to the confluence with Davis CreekWild(B)Davis Creek confluence to 1 mile
downstream of Davis Creek confluenceScenic(C)One mile downstream of Davis Creek 
confluence to western boundary of
Section 6 T12N R4WWild(D)Western boundary of Section 6
to the confluence with Bear CreekScenic(E)Bear Creek confluence to Camp
HaswellRecreational(p)Mokelumne River:(1)Segment A1: North Fork Mokelumne River from 0.50 miles downstream of the Salt Springs Dam to Bear River confluenceRecreational(2)Segment A2: North Fork Mokelumne River from the Bear River confluence to 0.50 miles upstream of the Tiger Creek
 PowerhouseWild(3)Segment B: North Fork Mokelumne River from 1,000 feet downstream of the Tiger Creek Afterbay Dam to State Highway Route 26 (SR-26)Scenic(4)Segment C1: North Fork Mokelumne River from 400 feet downstream of the small reregulating dam at the outlet of the West Point Powerhouse to the southern boundary of Section 12, T6N R12EWild(5)Segment C2: Section 12 boundary to confluence of the North and Middle Forks Mokelumne RiverRecreational(6)Segment D: Mokelumne River from the confluence of the North and Middle Forks to 300 feet upstream of the Electra PowerhouseScenic(7)Segment E: Mokelumne River from 300 feet downstream of the small reregulating dam downstream of the Electra Powerhouse to the Pardee Reservoir flood surcharge pool at 580 feet elevation above mean sea levelRecreational(2)Segment A2: North Fork Mokelumne River from the Bear River confluence to 0.50 mile upstream of the Tiger Creek PowerhouseWild.(2)Segment A2: North Fork Mokelumne River from the Bear River confluence to 0.50 mile upstream of the Tiger Creek PowerhouseWild.(2)Segment A2: North Fork Mokelumne River from the Bear River confluence to 0.50 mile upstream of the Tiger Creek PowerhouseWild.(D)Western boundary of Section 6
to
 the confluence with Bear CreekScenic(E)Bear Creek confluence to Camp
HaswellRecreational(4)Segment C1: North Fork Mokelumne River from 400 feet downstream of the small reregulating dam at the outlet of the West Point Powerhouse to the southern boundary of Section 12, T6N R12EWild.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 401, Sec. 11.   (AB 1520)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5093.546.

Classification or reclassification of rivers or segments of rivers within the system as wild, scenic, or recreational shall be by statute. The secretary may recommend legislation to classify or reclassify rivers or segments of rivers within the system, and may include specific land use restrictions relative to each particular classification in such recommendations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1481, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

5093.547.

(a) The secretary shall study and submit to the Governor and the Legislature reports on the suitability or nonsuitability for addition to the system of rivers or segments thereof which are designated by the Legislature as potential additions to the system. The secretary shall report to the Legislature his or her recommendations and proposals with respect to the designation of a river or segment.

(b) Each report, including maps and illustrations, shall show, among other things,
 the area included within the report, the characteristics which do or do not make the area a worthy addition to the system, the current status of land ownership and use in the immediate environment, and the reasonably foreseeable potential uses of the land and water which will be enhanced, foreclosed, or curtailed if the river or river segment were included in the system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 183, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

5093.55.

Other than temporary flood storage facilities permitted pursuant to Section 5093.57, no dam, reservoir, diversion, or other water impoundment facility may be constructed on any river and segment thereof designated in Section 5093.54; nor may a water diversion facility be constructed on the river and segment unless and until the secretary determines that the facility is needed to supply domestic water to the residents of the county or counties through which the river and segment flows, and unless and until the secretary determines that the facility will not
 adversely affect the free-flowing condition and natural character of the river and segment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 545, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

5093.56.

No department or agency of the state may assist or cooperate, whether by loan, grant, license, or otherwise, with any department or agency of the federal, state, or local government, in the planning or construction of a dam, reservoir, diversion, or other water impoundment facility that could have an adverse effect on the free-flowing condition and natural character of the rivers and segments thereof designated in Section 5093.54 as included in the system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 51, Sec. 27.   (SB 854)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

5093.57.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit any measures for flood protection, structural or nonstructural, necessary for the protection of lives and property along the Eel River as described in subdivision (d) of Section 5093.54, except for dams, reservoirs, or other water impoundment structures; provided, however, that such measures for flood protection may include facilities for temporary flood storage or flood storage basins on tributaries of the Eel River.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1259.)
-------------------------------------------

5093.58.

This chapter neither diminishes the power of the secretary or any other state or local official or agency under any other statute, nor conveys any authority, express or implied, to the secretary or any state or local agency, commission, board, or official to adopt or implement any interim or permanent order, rule, regulation, guideline, or directive concerning land use regulation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1481, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

5093.60.

The Resources Agency shall be responsible for coordinating the activities of state agencies whose activities affect the rivers in the system with those of other state, local, and federal agencies with jurisdiction over matters which may affect the rivers.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1481, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

5093.61.

All departments and agencies of the state shall exercise their powers granted under any other provision of law in a manner that protects the free-flowing state of each component of the system and the extraordinary values for which each component was included in the system. All local government agencies shall exercise their powers granted under any other provision of law in a manner consistent with the policy and provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 545, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

5093.62.

Nothing in this chapter shall affect the jurisdiction or responsibility of the state with regard to fish, wildlife, or their habitat. Hunting and fishing may be permitted on lands and waters administered as parts of the system under applicable state or federal laws and regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1481, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

5093.63.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to permit or require the reservation, use, or taking of private property for scenic, fishery, wildlife, or recreation purposes, for inclusion in the system or for other public use, without just compensation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1259.)
-------------------------------------------

5093.64.

If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1259.)
-------------------------------------------

5093.66.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the enactment of this section is necessary in order to allow extraction and refinement of strategic metals at a site on Gasquet Mountain within the Smith River watershed.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 5093.54 or any other provisions of this chapter, Hardscrabble Creek and all of its tributaries, a tributary of the Smith River, are excluded from the system.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 5093.58 or any other provision of
 this chapter, Copper Creek and all of its tributaries, a tributary to the Smith River, located in Sections 26, 27, 28, 34, and 35 of Township 18 North, Range 1 East, within the County of Del Norte, are classified as recreational.

(d) In order to protect extraordinary scenic, recreational, fishery, or wildlife values within one-quarter mile of the north fork of the Smith River located in the County of Del Norte, no mining activity shall be permitted which would result in a significant adverse effect to these values within one-quarter mile of the north fork of the Smith River.

(e) Nothing in this section or Section 5093.67 is intended to modify or limit the regulatory authority of any state agency under any other provision of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1336, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

5093.67.

In order to enhance the recreational qualities of rivers where temporary summer recreational dams have been constructed in the past to improve water oriented recreational opportunities for the public, the secretary may authorize the emplacement of temporary impoundments for recreational purposes on portions of rivers included in the system which are classified as recreational, if the secretary finds all of the following:

(a) There has been a history of impoundments at the location for recreational purposes.

(b) The impoundment will not cause an adverse effect on the fishery values of the river.

(c) The impoundment will be removed before it would interfere with anadromous fisheries.

(d) The impoundment will improve the recreational opportunities for the public.

(e) The impoundment will not adversely affect navigation, scenic qualities, and public access.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 14, Sec. 2.   Effective February 5, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

5093.68.

(a) Within the boundaries of special treatment areas adjacent to wild, scenic, or recreational river segments, all of the following provisions shall apply, in addition to any other applicable provision under this chapter or generally, whether by statute or regulation:

(1) A timber operator, whether licensed or not, is responsible for the actions of his or her employees. The registered professional forester who prepares and signs a timber harvesting plan, a timber management plan, or a notice of timber operations is responsible for its contents, but is not responsible for the implementation or execution of the plan or notice unless employed for that purpose.

(2) A registered professional forester preparing a timber harvesting plan shall certify that he or she or a qualified representative has personally inspected the plan area on the ground.

(b) In order to temporarily suspend timber operations that are being conducted within special treatment areas adjacent to wild, scenic, or recreational rivers designated pursuant to Section 5093.54, while judicial remedies are pursued pursuant to this section, an inspecting forest officer of the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection may issue a written timber operations stop order if, upon reasonable cause, the officer determines that a timber operation is being conducted, or is about to be conducted, in violation of Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 4511) of Part 2 of Division 4, or of rules
 and regulations adopted pursuant to those provisions, and that the violation or threatened violation would result in imminent and substantial damage to soil, water, or timber resources or to fish and wildlife habitat. A stop order shall apply only to those acts or omissions that are the proximate cause of the violation or that are reasonably foreseen would be the proximate cause of a violation. The stop order shall be effective immediately and throughout the next day.

(c) A supervising forest officer may, after an onsite investigation, extend a stop order issued pursuant to subdivision (b) for up to five days, excluding Saturday and Sunday, if the forest officer finds that the original stop order was issued upon reasonable cause. A stop order shall not be issued or extended for the same act or omission more than one time.

(d) Each stop order shall identify the specific act or omission that constitutes a violation or that, if foreseen, would constitute a violation, the specific timber operation that is to be stopped, and any corrective or mitigative actions that may be required.

(e) The Department of Forestry and Fire Protection may terminate the stop order if the timber operator enters into a written agreement with the department assuring that the timber operator will resume operations in compliance with Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 4511) of Part 2 of Division 4, and with the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to that chapter, and will correct any violation. The department may require a reasonable cash deposit or bond payable to the department as a condition of compliance with the
 agreement.

(f) Notice of the issuance of a stop order or an extension of a stop order shall be deemed to have been made to all persons working on the timber operation when a copy of the written order is delivered to the person in charge of operations at the time that the order is issued or, if no persons are present at that time, by posting a copy of the order conspicuously on the yarder or log loading equipment at a currently active landing on the timber operations site. If no person is present at the site when the order is issued, the issuing forest officer shall deliver a copy of the order to the timber operator either in person or to the operator’s address of record prior to the commencement of the next working day.

(g) As used in this section, “forest officer” means a registered professional
 forester employed by the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection in a civil service classification of forester I or higher grade.

(h) (1) Failure of the timber operator or an employee of the timber operator, after receiving notice pursuant to this section, to comply with a validly issued stop order is a violation of this section and is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500), or by imprisonment for not more than one year in the county jail, or both. The person shall also be subject to civil damages to the state not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each misdemeanor violation. However, in all cases, the timber operator, and not an employee of the operator or any other person, shall be charged with that violation. Each day or portion of the day that the violation
 continues shall constitute a new and separate offense.

(2) In determining the penalty for a timber operator guilty of violating a validly issued stop order, the court shall take into consideration all relevant circumstances, including, but not limited to, the following:

(A) The extent of harm to soil, water, or timber resources or to fish and wildlife habitat.

(B) Corrective action, if any, taken by the defendant.

(i) Nothing in this section prevents a timber operator from seeking an alternative writ as prescribed in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1084) of Title 1 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure, or as provided by any other provision of law.

(j) (1) If a timber operator believes that a forest officer lacked reasonable cause to issue or extend a stop order pursuant to this section, the timber operator may present a claim to the Department of General Services pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code for compensation and damages resulting from the stopping of timber operations.

(2) If the Department of General Services finds that the forest officer lacked reasonable cause to issue or extend the stop order, the board shall award a sum of not less than one hundred dollars ($100), nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), per day for each day the order was in effect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 349, Sec. 10.   (AB 3257)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

5093.69.

(a) The Resources Agency shall conduct studies specifically funded by the Legislature relative to the condition of the system and may make recommendations to the Legislature for protection and enhancement of the system.

(b) The director shall conduct studies specifically funded by the Legislature and shall make recommendations relating to all of the following:

(1) The restoration of salmon and steelhead habitat in the system, including measures that can be taken to increase spawning populations, and provide
 at least 100 miles of reopened spawning and nursery areas each year until the year 1990. 

(2) Enforcement requirements necessary to protect the system from fish or wildlife degradation.

(3) Development of information or statistical data necessary to provide the most beneficial management of the fisheries included within the system.

(4) Legislative action deemed necessary to protect the fishery and wildlife values of the system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1481, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

5093.70.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(1) Mill Creek and Deer Creek possess extraordinary resources in that they support one of the few remaining viable populations of wild spring-run chinook salmon in the Sacramento-San Joaquin River system. One essential component of the resources provided by these creeks is their exceptional water quality.

(2) Based on a review of comprehensive
 technical data, the Legislature has determined that potential beneficial uses must be balanced to achieve protection of the unique fishery resources and existing water rights of Mill Creek and Deer Creek in the manner specified in this section. In lieu of including Mill Creek and Deer Creek in the system, the continued management of stream resources in their existing natural condition consistent with the terms of this section represents the best way to protect the unique fishery of Mill Creek and Deer Creek. Maintaining the existing free flowing conditions of Mill Creek and Deer Creek to protect their fisheries is the highest and most beneficial use of the unappropriated waters of Mill Creek and Deer Creek within the segments designated in subdivisions (b) and (c), and is a reasonable use of water within the meaning of Section 2 of Article X of the California Constitution.

(b) No new dam, reservoir, diversion, or other water impoundment
 facility shall be constructed on Mill Creek from the headwaters of East Sulphur Creek within Section 15 T30N R4E to the United States Geological Survey gauging station in the northeast quarter of the northwest quarter of Section 6 T25N, R1W.

(c) No new dam, reservoir, diversion, or other water impoundment facility shall be constructed on Deer Creek from the headwaters in Section 11 T27N R5E to the United States Geological Survey gauging station in the northwest quarter of the northeast quarter of Section 23 T25N, R1W.

(d) Except for the maintenance of existing flood control facilities and projects by public agencies or private landowners or emergency flood control activities or repairs required due to acts of God, provided that those activities or projects do not interfere with the passage of migrating anadromous fish, no state agency shall assist or cooperate with, whether by
 loan, grant, license, or otherwise, any agency of the federal, state, or local government in the planning or construction of any dam, reservoir, diversion, or other water impoundment facility that could have an adverse effect on the free-flowing conditions of Mill Creek and Deer Creek, or on their wild runs of spring-run chinook salmon.

(e) All state agencies exercising powers under any other provision of law with respect to the protection and restoration of fishery resources shall continue to exercise those powers in a manner that protects and enhances the fishery of the segments designated in subdivisions (b) and (c). In carrying out this subdivision, any exercise of powers shall be consistent with Section 5093.58.

(f) Nothing in this section shall prejudice, alter, affect in any way, delay, or interfere with the implementation or construction of any fishery restoration or
 improvement project that is authorized, required, or recommended pursuant to the Central Valley Improvement Act (Public Law 102-575) or the Upper Sacramento River Fisheries and Riparian Habitat Management Plan developed pursuant to Chapter 885 of the Statutes of 1986, or of any other fishery restoration or improvement project.

(g) Nothing in this chapter shall prejudice, alter, affect in any way, delay, or interfere with existing water rights; implementation of those rights; historic water use practices; and replacement, maintenance, repair, or operation of diversions and diversion facilities; or changes in the purposes of use, places of use, points of diversion, or ownership of existing water rights, except that no change shall operate to increase the adverse effect, if any, of the preexisting diversion facility or place or purpose of use upon the free flowing and natural character of the stream.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 183, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

5093.71.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 5093.546 and 5093.547, if (1) the federal government enacts a statute that, upon enactment, would require the removal or delisting of any river or segment of a river in California that is included in the national wild and scenic rivers system and not in the state wild and scenic rivers system, or (2) the secretary determines that the federal government by enactment of a statute or by executive order has exempted a river or segment of a river in California that is included in the national wild and scenic rivers system and not in the state wild and scenic rivers system from the provisions of subdivision (a) of Section 1278 of Title 16 of the United States Code governing restrictions on water resources projects, as that section read on January 1, 2018, that protect rivers, segments of rivers, or values
 for which those rivers were established as part of the national system, the secretary shall take both of the following actions:

(1) Hold a public hearing to provide information and an opportunity for public comment on any proposed addition to the state wild and scenic rivers system resulting from federal action to remove, delist, or exempt that river or segment of a river from those protective provisions of the national wild and scenic rivers system.

(2) (A) Based on the information obtained through the public hearing, determine whether the provision of state protection for the river or segments of the river removed, delisted, or exempted from the national wild and scenic rivers system is in the best interest of the state and, if so, add the river or segment of the river that is removed, delisted, or exempted from those federal protective provisions to the
 state wild and scenic rivers system, and classify the river or segment of the river as wild, scenic, or recreational. A river added to the state wild and scenic rivers system under this paragraph shall be considered to be a component of the system as if designated pursuant to Section 5093.54 and classified pursuant to Section 5093.545.

(B) If the secretary makes a determination to add a river or segment of a river to the state wild and scenic rivers system under this paragraph, the secretary shall take all actions necessary to ensure the addition of the river or segment of the river to the state wild and scenic rivers system, and to classify the river or segment of the river to be added as wild, scenic, or recreational.

(C) Any action taken by the secretary under this section to designate a river or segment of a river as wild, scenic, or recreational under the state wild and scenic rivers system pursuant to this paragraph shall not exceed the geographic length of any federal designation specifying the size or boundaries of a river or segment of a river included in the national wild and scenic rivers system, as prescribed by the federal government.

(D) Notwithstanding any other provision in this chapter, an action taken by the secretary under this paragraph to add and classify an addition to the state wild and scenic rivers system shall not do any of the following:

(i) Provide protective provisions that exceed the scope of the prior federal designation as wild, scenic, or recreational of that river or segment of the river.

(ii) Conflict with any provisions of the prior federal designation of that river or segment of the river as wild, scenic, or recreational.

(iii) Conflict with a Comprehensive River Management Plan prepared for that river or segment of the river.

(b) Any action taken under this section to add and designate a river or segment of the river as wild, scenic, or recreational under the state wild and scenic rivers system shall take effect immediately upon the date of that designation, and shall remain in effect until the effective date of a
 statute enacted to remove or modify a river or segment of a river that was added to the state wild and scenic rivers system as described in subdivision (c).

(c) The Legislature may enact a statute to remove, modify, or reclassify a designation of a river or segment of a river added to the state wild and scenic rivers system by the action of the secretary pursuant to this section.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to provide any protections beyond the scope of those provided in the national wild and scenic rivers system that applied to that river or segment of the river before the river or segment of the river was removed, delisted, or
 exempted from the national wild and scenic rivers system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 431, Sec. 1.   (AB 43)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 1.5. Federal Water Project Recreation Act [5094. - 5094.5.]

5094.

It is hereby declared to be in the public interest for the state and local public agencies to participate with the federal government with respect to recreation and fish and wildlife enhancement facilities at federal water projects to the extent that such facilities are deemed necessary and desirable by the state or local public agency participating. The state may participate in any such project to the extent that it is of statewide importance and that local public agencies are unwilling or unable to do so and to the extent the Legislature appropriates funds necessary therefor. The state and local agencies may cooperate and jointly participate in a project where the interests of both will be advantageously served.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 143.)
-------------------------------------------

5094.1.

The Secretary of the Resources Agency, with the approval of the Director of Finance and upon specific authorization by the Legislature, may indicate in writing the state’s intent to agree to administer any federal multiple-purpose water project land and water areas for recreation or fish and wildlife enhancement, or both of these purposes, as provided in Public Law 89-72. The secretary, as to each proposed state participation, shall submit any proposed indication of intent, together with supporting material, to the Legislature.

The secretary, before requesting legislative authorization, shall determine that the proposed state participation in the project is in compliance with all comprehensive water, recreation, and fish and wildlife plans of the state.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the Department of Fish and Game may review and coordinate the development of fish and wildlife enhancement features at federal water projects with fish and wildlife plans of the state, irrespective of whether the state agrees to administer the project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 380.)
-------------------------------------------

5094.2.

With respect to each project as to which a letter of intent has been given, the Resources Agency through the Department of Parks and Recreation and the Department of Fish and Game, in cooperation with affected local public agencies, shall conduct an investigation and study of the project with respect to the areas of interest of each and prepare plans of the proposed state participation therein. The plans shall be submitted, upon request, to each affected local public agency for its review and comments thereon. The comments shall be transmitted to the agency by the affected local public agency within such period as determined by the administrator, which period shall be not less than 30 days nor more than 60 days from the date of submission to the local public agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 745, Sec. 172.   Effective October 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

5094.3.

Upon specific authorization of state participation by the Legislature:

(a) The Department of Parks and Recreation and the Department of Fish and Game may cooperate and participate with the federal government pursuant to Public Law 89-72 in the development of recreation and fish and wildlife enhancement at federal water projects. Where both the recreation and fish and wildlife enhancement functions are involved in a project the department having the principal interest as designated by the Administrator of the Resources Agency shall be the contracting agency with the federal government. In such case the contract shall be subject to approval of the other department.

(b) The departments may (1) administer unit land and water areas for recreation or fish and wildlife enhancement, or both, (2) contract with the federal government for the operation, maintenance, and replacement of unit facilities, (3) assume all costs of such operation, maintenance, and replacement, and (4) accept transfer of unit lands or facilities by lease or exchange upon such terms and conditions as will best promote the development and operation of such lands or facilities in the public interest for recreation or fish and wildlife enhancement purposes, or both.
